Massachusetts, session 194th, H2173.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Subsection (a) of Section 9R of Chapter 23 of the General Laws is hereby
repealed and replaced with the following:-
(a) There shall be in the department of labor relations a commonwealth employment
relations board, in this and the following 5 sections called the ''board,'' consisting of 3 members
to be appointed by the governor, 1 of whom shall be a representative of organized labor chosen
from a list of 3 candidates provided by the president of the Massachusetts AFL-CIO, 1 of whom
shall be a representative of municipal management chosen from a list of 3 candidates provided
by the Massachusetts Municipal Association, and 1 of whom shall be neutral. The board shall in
no respect be subject to the jurisdiction of the executive office of labor and workforce
development except to the extent of compliance with reasonable requests from the secretary for
the sharing of information which does not interfere with the efficient and independent
functioning of the board. Each member of the board shall be appointed for a term of 5 years;
of 2

provided, however, that a term of appointment shall be shortened, if necessary, to ensure that the
members' terms are staggered such that a term expires every 2 years. Any vacancy in the board
shall be filled by appointment in like manner. No more than 2 members shall be from the same
political party. Upon the expiration of the term of any member, her successor shall be appointed
in like manner. Any member may be removed by the governor for neglect of duty or malfeasance
in office, but for no other cause.
of 2